src/dictionaries/lv_LV.aff
SFX %   çrt   eramas     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramâs     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   erami      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramie     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramiem    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramo      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramos     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramu      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramus     [ç]rt

#
#Divdabji is/usi // uğais/usî
#
SFX e Y 25
SFX e   t   is      t
SFX e   t   uğa     t
SFX e   t   uğam    t
SFX e   t   uğu     t
SFX e   t   uğâ     t
SFX e   t   usi     t
SFX e   t   uğas    t
SFX e   t   uğai    t
SFX e   t   uği     t
SFX e   t   uğiem   t
SFX e   t   uğus    t
SFX e   t   uğos    t
SFX e   t   uğâm    t
SFX e   t   uğâs    t
SFX e   t   uğais   t
SFX e   t   uğajam  t
SFX e   t   uğo     t
SFX e   t   uğajâ   t
SFX e   t   usî     t
SFX e   t   uğajai  t
SFX e   t   uğie    t
SFX e   t   uğajiem t
SFX e   t   uğajos  t
SFX e   t   uğajâm  t
SFX e   t   uğajâs  t


#arî ît - no V grupas
SFX a Y 177
SFX a   t   is      [^gîklû]t
SFX a   t   uğa     [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğam    [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğu     [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğâ     [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   usi     [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğas    [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğai    [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uği     [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğiem   [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğus    [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğos    [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğâm    [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğâs    [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğais   [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğajam  [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğo     [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğajâ   [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   usî     [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğajai  [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğie    [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğajiem [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğajos  [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğajâm  [^lûî]t
SFX a   t   uğajâs  [^lûî]t
SFX a   kt  cis     [k]t
SFX a   gt  dzis    [g]t
SFX a   ût   uvis      [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğa     [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğam    [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğu     [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğâ     [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvusi     [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğas    [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğai    [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuği     [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğiem   [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğus    [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğos    [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğâm    [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğâs    [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğais   [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğajam  [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğo     [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğajâ   [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvusî     [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğajai  [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğie    [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğajiem [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğajos  [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğajâm  [û]t
SFX a   ût   uvuğajâs  [û]t
SFX a   ît   inis      [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğa     [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğam    [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğu     [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğâ     [î]t
SFX a   ît   inusi     [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğas    [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğai    [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuği     [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğiem   [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğus    [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğos    [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğâm    [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğâs    [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğais   [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğajam  [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğo     [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğajâ   [î]t
SFX a   ît   inusî     [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğajai  [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğie    [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğajiem [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğajos  [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğajâm  [î]t
SFX a   ît   inuğajâs  [î]t
SFX a   t   is      [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğa     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğam    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğu     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğâ     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   usi     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğas    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğai    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uği     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğiem   [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğus    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğos    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğâm    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğâs    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğais   [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğajam  [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğo     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğajâ   [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   usî     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğajai  [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğie    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğajiem [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğajos  [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğajâm  [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uğajâs  [^eiu]lt
SFX a   elt   çlis      [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğa     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğam    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğu     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğâ     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çlusi     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğas    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğai    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluği     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğiem   [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğus    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğos    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğâm    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğâs    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğais   [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğajam  [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğo     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğajâ   [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çlusî     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğajai  [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğie    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğajiem [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğajos  [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğajâm  [e]lt
SFX a   elt   çluğajâs  [e]lt
SFX a   ilt   îlis      [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğa     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğam    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğu     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğâ     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îlusi     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğas    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğai    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluği     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğiem   [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğus    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğos    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğâm    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğâs    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğais   [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğajam  [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğo     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğajâ   [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îlusî     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğajai  [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğie    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğajiem [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğajos  [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğajâm  [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   îluğajâs  [i]lt
SFX a   ult   ûlis      [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğa     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğam    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğu     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğâ     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûlusi     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğas    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğai    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluği     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğiem   [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğus    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğos    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğâm    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğâs    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğais   [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğajam  [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğo     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğajâ   [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûlusî     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğajai  [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğie    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğajiem [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğajos  [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğajâm  [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ûluğajâs  [u]lt

SFX b  Y 25
SFX b   t   jis      t
SFX b   t   juğa     t
SFX b   t   juğam    t
SFX b   t   juğu     t
SFX b   t   juğâ     t
SFX b   t   jusi     t
SFX b   t   juğas    t
SFX b   t   juğai    t
SFX b   t   juği     t
SFX b   t   juğiem   t
SFX b   t   juğus    t
SFX b   t   juğos    t
SFX b   t   juğâm    t
SFX b   t   juğâs    t
SFX b   t   juğais   t
SFX b   t   juğajam  t
SFX b   t   juğo     t
SFX b   t   juğajâ   t
SFX b   t   jusî     t
SFX b   t   juğajai  t
SFX b   t   juğie    t
SFX b   t   juğajiem t
SFX b   t   juğajos  t
SFX b   t   juğajâm  t
SFX b   t   juğajâs  t

SFX I Y 23
SFX I  t    ts      t
SFX I  t    ta      t
SFX I  t    tai     t
SFX I  t    tais    t
SFX I  t    tajai   t
SFX I  t    tajam   t
SFX I  t    tajiem  t
SFX I  t    tajos   t
SFX I  t    tajâ    t
SFX I  t    tajâm   t
SFX I  t    tajâs   t
SFX I  t    tam     t
SFX I  t    tas     t
SFX I  t    ti      t
SFX I  t    tie     t
SFX I  t    tiem    t
SFX I  t    to      t
SFX I  t    tos     t
SFX I  t    tus     t
SFX I  t    tâ      t
SFX I  t    tâm     t
SFX I  t    tâs     t
SFX I  t    tu      t

SFX 0 Y 1
SFX 0   0     u     t

SFX J Y 21
SFX J  t   ğana   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ğanas  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ğanai  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ğanu   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ğanâ   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ğanâs  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ğanâm  [^sz]t
SFX J  st  ğana   [s]t
SFX J  st  ğanas  [s]t
SFX J  st  ğanai  [s]t
SFX J  st  ğanu   [s]t
SFX J  st  ğanâ   [s]t
SFX J  st  ğanâs  [s]t
SFX J  st  ğanâm  [s]t
SFX J  zt  ğana   [z]t
SFX J  zt  ğanas  [z]t
SFX J  zt  ğanai  [z]t
SFX J  zt  ğanu   [z]t
SFX J  zt  ğanâ   [z]t
SFX J  zt  ğanâs  [z]t
SFX J  zt  ğanâm  [z]t
