src/dictionaries/lv_LV.dic
aizgrābāt/+B1H0
aizkniebt/6)+I$B4eJM
aizmargot/+JIMb)$HB1
aizmidzināt/+bIJhB(1MC
aizsaiņot/+bM)IGJ$BH1
aizskaut/+B5J06[M
aizslaukt/h+%aI6JB54M
aizslēpt/+6eIB$)JM4[
aizsniegt/%+(ahIB8d[56
aizvērt/M%+Ie[JdB4
aizķepēt/+$g[)Bd1Ib{HMGJ
antisanitārs/oaYi
apcirpt/+eJBId4[M
apdriskāt/+BdI1gbG[)H$MJ{
apdēt/B+JbM160
apgrāvot/+$BIJb1MH
apkampt/dB)eI+$6[M4J
apklupt/+BeIJ4M
apkraukt/+%IB6aM5J
apkraukāt/+HB10
apnest/+Ih8e4FJ(}M[
appūšļot/+)$bIHB1MJ
aprakstīt/Jb(BI1+C[M
aprotāt/HB+10
aprāt/BI)+$[b6J{1M
apskaužams/+aoiO
apsvilt/I+JZe^[MBd74
apsēkt/+JIa%BM65
aptērpt/+JB46M0
apvandīt/hBI1(b+MJ[C
apzaimot/+b$I1)HBMJ
apķengāt/+)bIB$Gd[{1JMgH
astigmātisks/oaYi
atbirt/e+ZI^7B4JM
atbrēkt/a+%5IBJ6M
atbrēkāt/B+H10
atdzīvināt/h+bBdI(cC1JgM[
atgrābāt/H+B10
atguldzēt/IBbJ+M1
atgāzt/6+deI[B4M
atlaidināt/+(bBdI1ghcMCJ[
atlamāt/+B01H
atlupt/+eIBMJ4
atmaukt/%aI+B5J6M
atplaukšķināt/c(hg+bJIdB1CM
atplet/0+
atreibt/J+ZeI^7MB4
atsaucīgs/oa+iY
atsvilpt/+eI)J$B6M4
attraukt/IB6a+%dJ5[M
atvaicāt/+${g)[JIGMHbdB1
atvaskot/+I)GgMbJB1$Hd
atvējot/Jb$)+IBdGHgM1
autodidaktisks/oaYi
bēguļot/b$+JgH)I[MBG{1d
caurs/a+Yoi
ciet/0+
citēt/${+gBIbGH)[JM1d
dainot/+$d)GIBbgH[J1{M
dinamisks/+Yoia
ekstrēms/oaYi
fotosintezēt/BdI+)HGbg1$J[M{
gludināt/+dhbc([I1BCgMJ
gotisks/oaYi
grauzdēt/+)Ig$JbMB1{G[Hd
grimt/e+^ZIJ4B7M
gulgt/+5aIB%6JM
iefiksēt/$+IB[b)dJ1gGMH
iegaiņāt/+BH01
iegremdēt/BIHGbg+$)dJ{[M1
iekampt/+eMBI6J4)$
ieknikšķēt/+cCI(Jbh[1BdMg
iekust/+%MJe7F04
iekūst/+%07
iemēgt/+6JB5M0
iemērkt/J[M%I+aB56
ienākt/(+a5BIMJhd8[}
iepaļāt/BH+01
ieskurbt/B7^+ZIMeJ4
iespiegt/%+MJ[IadB65
iespridzināt/+1(BIJcgCbhdM
iesvelpt/+JBIe6dM)$4[
iesērst/+F0M
iesīkt/+dBaI^Z5%7JM6[}
iezākāt/+BH01
iešalkt/+%adIB65J}M[
industrializēt/b{1IBg+J$)G[MdH
internēt/BIHGgbJ+d$)1M
intervēt/+$)bM{IBGJd1Hg[
izcelt/M6IB+5a[dJ
izcirpt/J+B4I[edM
izdunkāt/BH+10
izjādelēt/[+$MI)gHbGJBd1
izjūgt/+J%IBaMd[56
izkodināt/+bhI[(BgJCcdM1
izlobt/+)$eh4BI6MJ
izlīņāt/BH+10
izogot/b$H)GMIB+J1
izpalīdzēt/+IBbgCh(cJdM1
izplūkt/+[JI5B%M6ad
izrāpot/+Ib)B$HgG1dMJ
izsit/J%+0
iztraukt/+a%I6dB5MJ[
izzibēt/+hI(BbMCJ1
izšķērēt/+GBdI1gb$)MH[J
izšļūkāt/+g$)Bd1IbGHMJ
jocīgs/oaYi
jozt/BI+d6e[M4}
kliegt/5+%dBaI6J[M
krass/oaYi
kursēt/+$)BIgHJGb1dM
liels/OioaY
mehānistisks/oaYi
naidīgs/oaYi
nest/+hF[JM40
noart/6h+BIe(M4J
noasfaltēt/[dbJ)+$HGgIBM1
noautorizēt/+$bIg1HdBMJ)G[
noblenzt/e6+IBM4
nobraukt/+5B4I%hJ6aM
nogodāt/B+H10
noinkrustēt/M+b)B$HgI1dGJ
nokrākt/+a%JIdB65[M
nokust/+%eJI7M4F
noliegt/IaB6+J5%M
nolupināt/(dh+[gbMJIBCc1
nomuļļāt/HB+10
nomīlēt/+bIMJ1(h[BC
noraukt/+%[JIBa65M
nospridzēt/b+(hBM[I1JC
nosēņot/BdH+bI)1gMGJ
notariāls/oaYi
notaupīt/+IcbdB(ghJ1[MC
notupt/^+eIZJ[7B(h8dM4
nourgt/B5aI%+[}JM6
novajāt/+BH10
noārdīt/+JhbIB1(gdCcM
pacērt/+%0
padzisināt/b+c(hI1gd[JBMC
paekselēt/+$J[bgIB1)dGHM
paelpot/BI1+MbHg$)dGJ
pagodāt/+H1B0
pagrebt/+$)BJeIM4
paklausīgs/aio+Y
pakviekt/+M%6aIBJ5
pamedīt/B+)H$IJ1bM
panievāt/H+B10
papaist/+e%IhMJF74
paraut/$BI)M+^d[5J6
parukšķēt/MC+[B(IbhJ1
pasmirdināt/+cdBbh([gCI1JM
pasniegt/6+Idh[%aB(85
pastulbs/oaYi
paziedēt/+bIMh(BJ1C
paģērbt/+J)$IB46eM
paķengāt/B+{[gdG10H
paķērkstēt/IB+1bJM
paķērkt/ZJ+^M%I67B5a
pašļakstināt/+[hdbcBI1(MgCJ
piejūgt/+IaB6%M5J
pieklupt/IeB+JM4
pieplet/+0
piepotēt/d+b)$GIBg1JHM
pieriet/M%IB+J
pierobīt/+Jb)$HIBM1
piesalt/^+eIJMZ7B4
pieslacīt/+Mbh(1IBJd4[g
pieurgt/J+%aIMB65
plats/oaYi
pulcēt/+1dBIMbgG)$H[{J
pārbliezt/eI6B+M4
pārbraukt/+%JI4B5a6hM
pārdīkt/Jda+%M6IB5
pārdūkt/BdaIJ+%M65
pārguldīt/+[Jh(cgbIBdMC1
pārlobt/+IBe6)$4JM
pārlīkņāt/dBg+[H1{G0
pārmēslot/+IbBJ$G)MH1
pārplīst/%IJe+F4M7
pārpucēt/JBdIbgHG1+{$)M[
pārtrenkt/+M%Ia6Bd5J
pārtvaicēt/+b1IBGJ$gd)[MH
pārvērst/+[FIedM}
pāršķaidīt/+gBI1(bchJdMC
pārņirbt/+J(4Bhe80M
rasains/oaYi
reaģēt/H+I$B)gbJdG1M
sagāzt/6+eIB[d4M
sakabināt/Ib+(1BdCchgM[J
saklibot/+)bIB$HG1MJ
sakārpīt/b+(Bdcg1Ih[JMC
sakūst/%+07
samiegt/+%a}B6IJd[5M
sapost/3e+F}M[4
saspodrināt/(bg+JdhcI1B[CM
sasēņot/BdHb+$I)1gMGJ
sasūrstēt/b+[IB1MCJ
saģērbt/+eIJ)$dMB46[
saķengāt/B+H10
sašņākt/a6%+M[dJ5BI
sensibls/oYia
spiegot/BI+)HbGM$Jd[1
spitālīgs/oaYi
susēt/BIcbJM+gd1[
sēņveidīgs/oaYi
trenkāt/bd+M)g${1IBHG[J
tumīgs/oaYi
uzbirt/+^IeZB7JM4
uzklīst/%I+E7JN
uzkniest/I+FM34
uzkūst/+%07
uzlīnijot/+G$bH)[1IMJdB
uznest/+(IheMF4J[}8
uzsmērēt/Ib+J)d$M[{GgHB1
uzvakcinēt/M)GJ+bgdI$B1H
uzzvelt/6+IJ[adM5B
uzčukstēt/+bJIBM1C
uzšļūkt/6+J%BMaI5
vulgārs/oaYi
vērst/+edIF}M
ķeburains/oaYi
šķīdināt/gh+bdM(IB1CcJ[
